src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The No linguistic content language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON Cases
+Sg+Nom:0     #   ;
+Pl+Nom:i     #   ;
+Sg+Loc:as    #   ;
+Pl+Loc:ias   #   ;
+Sg+Acc:at    #   ;
+Pl+Acc:iat   #   ;
#:0   Nouns   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
