src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
!! Nouns
!  -----
!! Nouns in the No linguistic content language are things.

LEXICON Nouns
!!€gt-norm:  Noun
!!€  noun: noun+N+Sg+Nom # comment
noun+N:noun    Cases   ;
greeting+N:greeting Cases ;
fellow+N:fellow  Cases ;
youth+N:youth Cases ;
nuneral+N:nuneral Cases ;
á+N:á Cases ;
ỹ+N:ỹ Cases ;
ŋ́+N:ŋ́ Cases ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
